Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to  the Department of Corrections, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services .................................  $ 1,067,450,488
(2) Central administration
and administrative services .. $ 152,543,451
(3) Offender management
and rehabilitation.................. $ 73,425,543
(4) Community corrections ........ $ 294,290,629
(5) Debt service .......................... $ 112,749,173
(6) Capital improvements ........... $ 2,824,471
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Cor-
rections, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations and health
services ..................................... $ 14,827,169
(2) Central administration
and administrative services ...... $ 9,578,016
(3) Offender management
and rehabilitation...................... $ 11,056,753
(4) Community corrections ............ $ 7,009,979
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$4,363,309 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Department of Cor-
rections.
SECTION 4. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by the Department
of Corrections from federal funds for debt service on Build America Bonds are not limited.
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 2